src/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
!! Quantifier inflection

!! The UNDEFINED language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

!!!!!!!!!!!
!! NUMBERS 
!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON QNT_
+Qnt+TYÄ: K ;

LEXICON NUM_
+Num+TYÄ: K ;

LEXICON NUM-CARD_
+Num+Card+TYÄ: K ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL_
+Num+Card+Coll+TYÄ:	K ;

LEXICON NUM-ITER_
+Num+Card+Iter: K ;

LEXICON NUM-ORD_
+Num+Ord+TYÄ: K ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
